Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10001 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Kids
After-School Grant Program" (OKAGP).
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10002 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 12455 Page 1

There is hereby created at the Department of Human Services the
Oklahoma Kids After-School Grant Program (OKAGP). This grant
program shall be for non-religious community-based organizations
that run after-school programs for children grades kindergarten
through twelve. These entities may qualify for an exemption from
the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act based on the listed
exemptions found in Section 403 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. These entities must also have a minimum of five (5)
locations in Oklahoma, in which they operate themselves or through
an alliance. The Department of Human Services may promulgate rules
to implement this grant program.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 10003 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
SECTION 4. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Department of Human Services to be designated
the "Oklahoma Kids After-School Grant Program Revolving Fund". The
fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Department of Human Services from appropriations or donations. All
monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for the purpose
of awarding grants under the Oklahoma Kids After-School Grant
Program. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon warrants
Req. No. 12455 Page 2

issu ed by the State Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by
law with the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12455 MKS 02/10/25


















Req. No. 12455 Page 3